Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.205

Correct and incorrect—Instruments, devices, weights, measures—When deemed.

All weighing or measuring instruments or devices used for commercial purposes within this state must be correct. For the purposes of this chapter, weighing or measuring instruments or devices and weights and measures standards are deemed to be "correct" when they conform to all applicable requirements of this chapter and the requirements of any rule adopted by the department under this chapter; all other weighing or measuring instruments or devices and weights and measures standards are deemed to be "incorrect."

[ 2019 c 96 s 5; 1992 c 237 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.